Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2294
Final order.

An entry of deferred judgment pursuant to section 29-2292 or 29-4803 is a final order as defined in section 25-1902.

Laws 2019, LB686, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB253, § 12.